Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2101.01
Act, how cited.

Sections
13-2101 to 13-2112 shall be known and
may be cited as the Enterprise Zone Act.

Laws 1993, LB 725, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 4.